Wisconsin, session 2025, AB709.
do enact as follows:AB709,11Section 1. 121.555 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB709,2,32121.555 (1) (a) A motor vehicle transporting 9 14 or less fewer passengers in 3addition to the operator.AB709,24Section 2. 121.555 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB709,2,125121.555 (1) (b) A motor vehicle transporting 10 15 or more passengers in 6addition to the operator and used temporarily to provide transportation for 7purposes specified under s. 340.01 (56) (a) when the school board or the governing 8body requests the secretary of transportation to determine that an emergency exists 9because no regular transportation is available. The secretary of transportation 10shall approve or deny the request in writing. Any authorization granted under this 11paragraph shall specify the purpose and need for the emergency transportation 12service.AB709,313Section 3. 121.555 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB709,2,2114121.555 (2) (a) Insurance. If the vehicle is owned or leased by a school or a 15school bus contractor, or is a vehicle authorized under sub. (1) (b), it shall comply 16with s. 121.53. If the vehicle is transporting 9 14 or fewer persons in addition to 17the operator and is not owned or leased by a school or by a school bus contractor, it 18shall be insured by a policy providing property damage coverage with a limit of not 19less than $10,000 and bodily injury liability coverage with limits of not less than 20$25,000 for each person, and, subject to the limit for each person, a total limit of not 21less than $50,000 for each accident.AB709,2,2222